Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3404
Creation of land bank; procedure; use of Interlocal Cooperation Act; join by agreement; goal of land bank.

(1) A single municipality may create a land bank by the adoption of an ordinance which specifies the following:

(a) The name of the land bank;

(b) The initial individuals to serve as members of the board and the length of terms for which they are to serve; and

(c) The qualifications and terms of office of members of the board.

(2) Two or more municipalities may elect to enter into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act to create a single land bank to act on behalf of such municipalities, which agreement shall contain the information required by subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A municipality may elect to join an existing land bank by entering into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act with a municipality that has created a land bank pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or by joining an existing agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act with the municipalities that formed a land bank pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Agreements entered into or joined under this subsection shall contain the information required by subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Each land bank created pursuant to the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act shall be deemed to be a public corporation acting in a governmental capacity and a political subdivision of the state and shall have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated and dissolved in accordance with section 18-3414.

(5) The primary goal of any land bank shall be to facilitate the return of vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent properties to productive use.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5204;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 14.
July 18, 2026
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.